task03/english.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Pl

LEXICON Root

Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

cat Ninf;
potato Ninf;
goose Ninf;
beach Ninf;
gas Ninf;
knife Ninf;
elf Ninf;
fish Ninf;
sky Ninf;
toy Ninf;
medium Ninf;

LEXICON Ninf +N+Pl:^s  #;
